Missouri, session 2026, SB1293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 137.073, 137.079, and 137.115, RSMo,
2 are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
3 be known as sections 137.067, 137.073, 137.079, and 137.115, to
4 read as follows:
1 137.067. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
2 the contrary, any ballot measure seeking approval to add,
3 change, or modify a tax on real property shall express the
4 effect of the proposed change within the ballot language in
5 terms of the change in real dollars owed per one hundred
6 thousand dollars of a property's market valuation.
1 137.073. 1. As used in this section, the following
2 terms mean:
3 (1) "General reassessment", changes in value, entered
4 in the assessor's books, of a substantial portion of the
5 parcels of real property within a county resulting wholly or
6 partly from reappraisal of value or other actions of the
7 assessor or county equalization body or ordered by the state
8 tax commission or any court;
9 (2) "Tax rate", "rate", or "rate of levy", singular or
10 plural, includes the tax rate for each purpose of taxation
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1293 2
11 of property a taxing authority is authorized to levy without
12 a vote and any tax rate authorized by election, including
13 bond interest and sinking fund;
14 (3) "Tax rate ceiling", a tax rate as revised by the
15 taxing authority to comply with the provisions of this
16 section or when a court has determined the tax rate; except
17 that, other provisions of law to the contrary
18 notwithstanding, a school district may levy the operating
19 levy for school purposes required for the current year
20 pursuant to subsection 2 of section 163.021, less all
21 adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of
22 the Missouri Constitution, if such tax rate does not exceed
23 the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax
24 year. This is the maximum tax rate that may be levied,
25 unless a higher tax rate ceiling is approved by voters of
26 the political subdivision as provided in this section;
27 (4) "Tax revenue", when referring to the previous
28 year, means the actual receipts from ad valorem levies on
29 all classes of property, including state-assessed property,
30 in the immediately preceding fiscal year of the political
31 subdivision, plus an allowance for taxes billed but not
32 collected in the fiscal year and plus an additional
33 allowance for the revenue which would have been collected
34 from property which was annexed by such political
35 subdivision but which was not previously used in determining
36 tax revenue pursuant to this section. The term "tax
37 revenue" shall not include any receipts from ad valorem
38 levies on any property of a railroad corporation or a public
39 utility, as these terms are defined in section 386.020,
40 which were assessed by the assessor of a county or city in
41 the previous year but are assessed by the state tax
42 commission in the current year. All school districts and

SB 1293 3
43 those counties levying sales taxes pursuant to chapter 67
44 shall include in the calculation of tax revenue an amount
45 equivalent to that by which they reduced property tax levies
46 as a result of sales tax pursuant to section 67.505 and
47 section 164.013 [or as excess home dock city or county fees
48 as provided in subsection 4 of section 313.820] in the
49 immediately preceding fiscal year but not including any
50 amount calculated to adjust for prior years. For purposes
51 of political subdivisions which were authorized to levy a
52 tax in the prior year but which did not levy such tax or
53 levied a reduced rate, the term "tax revenue", as used in
54 relation to the revision of tax levies mandated by law,
55 shall mean the revenues equal to the amount that would have
56 been available if the voluntary rate reduction had not been
57 made.
58 2. Whenever changes in assessed valuation are entered
59 in the assessor's books for any personal property, in the
60 aggregate, or for any subclass of real property as such
61 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
62 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
63 the county clerk in all counties and the assessor of St.
64 Louis City shall notify each political subdivision wholly or
65 partially within the county or St. Louis City of the change
66 in valuation of each subclass of real property,
67 individually, and personal property, in the aggregate,
68 exclusive of new construction and improvements. All
69 political subdivisions shall immediately revise the
70 applicable rates of levy for each purpose for each subclass
71 of real property, individually, and personal property, in
72 the aggregate, for which taxes are levied to the extent
73 necessary to produce from all taxable property, exclusive of
74 new construction and improvements, substantially the same

SB 1293 4
75 amount of tax revenue as was produced in the previous year
76 for each subclass of real property, individually, and
77 personal property, in the aggregate, except that the [rate]
78 rates of levy for each subclass of real property,
79 individually, and personal property, in the aggregate, shall
80 not exceed the greater of the most recent voter-approved
81 rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted
82 under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this section. Any
83 political subdivision that has received approval from voters
84 for a tax increase after August 27, 2008, may levy a rate to
85 collect substantially the same amount of tax revenue as the
86 amount of revenue that would have been derived by applying
87 the voter-approved increased tax rate ceiling to the total
88 assessed valuation of the political subdivision as most
89 recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before
90 the date of the election in which such increase is approved,
91 increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price
92 index, as provided by law, except that the rate shall not
93 exceed the greater of the most recent voter-approved rate or
94 the most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted under
95 subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this section. Such tax
96 revenue shall not include any receipts from ad valorem
97 levies on any real property which was assessed by the
98 assessor of a county or city in such previous year but is
99 assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current
100 year in a different subclass of real property. Where the
101 taxing authority is a school district for the purposes of
102 revising the applicable rates of levy for each subclass of
103 real property, the tax revenues from state-assessed railroad
104 and utility property shall be apportioned and attributed to
105 each subclass of real property based on the percentage of
106 the total assessed valuation of the county that each

SB 1293 5
107 subclass of real property represents in the current
108 [taxable] tax year. As provided in Section 22 of Article X
109 of the constitution, a political subdivision may also revise
110 each levy to allow for inflationary assessment growth
111 occurring within the political subdivision. The
112 inflationary growth factor for any such subclass of real
113 property or personal property shall be limited to the actual
114 assessment growth in such subclass or class, exclusive of
115 new construction and improvements, and exclusive of the
116 assessed value on any real property which was assessed by
117 the assessor of a county or city in the current year in a
118 different subclass of real property, but not to exceed the
119 consumer price index or five percent, whichever is lower.
120 [Should the tax revenue of a political subdivision from the
121 various tax rates determined in this subsection be different
122 than the tax revenue that would have been determined from a
123 single tax rate as calculated pursuant to the method of
124 calculation in this subsection prior to January 1, 2003,
125 then the political subdivision shall revise the tax rates of
126 those subclasses of real property, individually, and/or
127 personal property, in the aggregate, in which there is a tax
128 rate reduction, pursuant to the provisions of this
129 subsection. Such revision shall yield an amount equal to
130 such difference and shall be apportioned among such
131 subclasses of real property, individually, and/or personal
132 property, in the aggregate, based on the relative assessed
133 valuation of the class or subclasses of property
134 experiencing a tax rate reduction. Such revision in the tax
135 rates of each class or subclass shall be made by computing
136 the percentage of current year adjusted assessed valuation
137 of each class or subclass with a tax rate reduction to the
138 total current year adjusted assessed valuation of the class

SB 1293 6
139 or subclasses with a tax rate reduction, multiplying the
140 resulting percentages by the revenue difference between the
141 single rate calculation and the calculations pursuant to
142 this subsection and dividing by the respective adjusted
143 current year assessed valuation of each class or subclass to
144 determine the adjustment to the rate to be levied upon each
145 class or subclass of property. The adjustment computed
146 herein shall be multiplied by one hundred, rounded to four
147 decimals in the manner provided in this subsection, and
148 added to the initial rate computed for each class or
149 subclass of property. For school districts that levy
150 separate tax rates on each subclass of real property and
151 personal property in the aggregate, if voters approved a
152 ballot before January 1, 2011, that presented separate
153 stated tax rates to be applied to the different subclasses
154 of real property and personal property in the aggregate, or
155 increases the separate rates that may be levied on the
156 different subclasses of real property and personal property
157 in the aggregate by different amounts, the tax rate that
158 shall be used for the single tax rate calculation shall be a
159 blended rate, calculated in the manner provided under
160 subdivision (1) of subsection 6 of this section.
161 Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the
162 contrary, no revision to the rate of levy for personal
163 property shall cause such levy to increase over the levy for
164 personal property from the prior year.]
165 3. (1) Where the taxing authority is a school
166 district, it shall be required to revise the rates of levy
167 to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable
168 property, including state-assessed railroad and utility
169 property, which shall be separately estimated in addition to
170 other data required in complying with section 164.011,

SB 1293 7
171 substantially the amount of tax revenue permitted in this
172 section. In the year following tax rate reduction, the tax
173 rate ceiling may be adjusted to offset such district's
174 reduction in the apportionment of state school moneys due to
175 its reduced tax rate. However, in the event any school
176 district, in calculating a tax rate ceiling pursuant to this
177 section, requiring the estimating of effects of state-
178 assessed railroad and utility valuation or loss of state
179 aid, discovers that the estimates used result in receipt of
180 excess revenues, which would have required a lower rate if
181 the actual information had been known, the school district
182 shall reduce the tax rate ceiling in the following year to
183 compensate for the excess receipts, and the recalculated
184 rate shall become the tax rate ceiling for purposes of this
185 section.
186 (2) For any political subdivision which experiences a
187 reduction in the amount of assessed valuation relating to a
188 prior year, due to decisions of the state tax commission or
189 a court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433, or due to
190 clerical errors or corrections in the calculation or
191 recordation of any assessed valuation:
192 (a) Such political subdivision may revise the tax rate
193 ceiling for each purpose it levies taxes to compensate for
194 the reduction in assessed value occurring after the
195 political subdivision calculated the tax rate ceiling for
196 the particular subclass of real property or for personal
197 property, in the aggregate, in a prior year. Such revision
198 by the political subdivision shall be made at the time of
199 the next calculation of the tax rate for the particular
200 subclass of real property or for personal property, in the
201 aggregate, after the reduction in assessed valuation has
202 been determined and shall be calculated in a manner that

SB 1293 8
203 results in the revised tax rate ceiling being the same as it
204 would have been had the corrected or finalized assessment
205 been available at the time of the prior calculation;
206 (b) In addition, for up to three years following the
207 determination of the reduction in assessed valuation as a
208 result of circumstances defined in this subdivision, such
209 political subdivision may levy a tax rate for each purpose
210 it levies taxes above the revised tax rate ceiling provided
211 in paragraph (a) of this subdivision to recoup any revenues
212 it was entitled to receive had the corrected or finalized
213 assessment been available at the time of the prior
214 calculation.
215 4. (1) In order to implement the provisions of this
216 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
217 Missouri, the term improvements shall apply to [both] real
218 [and personal] property. In order to determine the value of
219 new construction and improvements, each county assessor
220 shall maintain a record of real property valuations in such
221 a manner as to identify each year the increase in valuation
222 for each political subdivision in the county as a result of
223 new construction and improvements. The value of new
224 construction and improvements shall include the additional
225 assessed value of all improvements or additions to real
226 property which were begun after and were not part of the
227 prior year's assessment, except that the additional assessed
228 value of all improvements or additions to real property
229 which had been totally or partially exempt from ad valorem
230 taxes pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865, sections
231 135.200 to 135.255, and section 353.110 shall be included in
232 the value of new construction and improvements when the
233 property becomes totally or partially subject to assessment
234 and payment of all ad valorem taxes. [The aggregate

SB 1293 9
235 increase in valuation of personal property for the current
236 year over that of the previous year is the equivalent of the
237 new construction and improvements factor for personal
238 property. Notwithstanding any opt-out implemented pursuant
239 to subsection 14 of section 137.115,] the assessor shall
240 certify the amount of new construction and improvements and
241 the amount of assessed value on any real property which was
242 assessed by the assessor of a county or city in such
243 previous year but is assessed by the assessor of a county or
244 city in the current year in a different subclass of real
245 property separately for each of the three subclasses of real
246 property for each political subdivision to the county clerk
247 in order that political subdivisions shall have this
248 information for the purpose of calculating tax rates
249 pursuant to this section and Section 22, Article X,
250 Constitution of Missouri. In addition, the state tax
251 commission shall certify each year to each county clerk the
252 increase in the general price level as measured by the
253 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
254 States, or its successor publications, as defined and
255 officially reported by the United States Department of
256 Labor, or its successor agency. The state tax commission
257 shall certify the increase in such index on the latest
258 twelve-month basis available on February first of each year
259 over the immediately preceding prior twelve-month period in
260 order that political subdivisions shall have this
261 information available in setting their tax rates according
262 to law and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
263 Missouri. For purposes of implementing the provisions of
264 this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Missouri
265 Constitution, the term "property" means all taxable
266 property, including state-assessed property.

SB 1293 10
267 (2) Each political subdivision required to revise
268 rates of levy pursuant to this section or Section 22 of
269 Article X of the Constitution of Missouri shall calculate
270 each tax rate it is authorized to levy and, in establishing
271 each tax rate, shall consider each provision for tax rate
272 revision provided in this section and Section 22 of Article
273 X of the Constitution of Missouri, separately and without
274 regard to annual tax rate reductions provided in section
275 67.505 and section 164.013. Each political subdivision
276 shall set each tax rate it is authorized to levy using the
277 calculation that produces the lowest tax rate ceiling. It
278 is further the intent of the general assembly, pursuant to
279 the authority of Section 10(c) of Article X of the
280 Constitution of Missouri, that the provisions of such
281 section be applicable to tax rate revisions mandated
282 pursuant to Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
283 Missouri as to reestablishing tax rates as revised in
284 subsequent years, enforcement provisions, and other
285 provisions not in conflict with Section 22 of Article X of
286 the Constitution of Missouri. Annual tax rate reductions
287 provided in section 67.505 and section 164.013 shall be
288 applied to the tax rate as established pursuant to this
289 section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
290 Missouri, unless otherwise provided by law.
291 5. (1) In all political subdivisions, the tax rate
292 ceiling established pursuant to this section shall not be
293 increased unless approved by a vote of the people. Approval
294 of the higher tax rate shall be by at least a majority of
295 votes cast. When a proposed higher tax rate requires
296 approval by more than a simple majority pursuant to any
297 provision of law or the constitution, the tax rate increase
298 must receive approval by at least the majority required.

SB 1293 11
299 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
300 all tax levy increases applied to any real and personal
301 property shall be applied to each subclass of property
302 equally.
303 (2) When voters approve an increase in the tax rate,
304 the amount of the increase shall be added to the tax rate
305 ceiling as calculated pursuant to this section to the extent
306 the total rate does not exceed any maximum rate prescribed
307 by law. If a ballot question presents a stated tax rate for
308 approval rather than describing the amount of increase in
309 the question, the stated tax rate approved shall be adjusted
310 as provided in this section and, so adjusted, shall be the
311 current tax rate ceiling. The increased tax rate ceiling as
312 approved shall be adjusted such that when applied to the
313 current total assessed valuation of the political
314 subdivision, excluding new construction and improvements
315 since the date of the election approving such increase, the
316 revenue derived from the adjusted tax rate ceiling is equal
317 to the sum of: the amount of revenue which would have been
318 derived by applying the voter-approved increased tax rate
319 ceiling to total assessed valuation of the political
320 subdivision, as most recently certified by the city or
321 county clerk on or before the date of the election in which
322 such increase is approved, increased by the percentage
323 increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law.
324 Such adjusted tax rate ceiling may be applied to the total
325 assessed valuation of the political subdivision at the
326 setting of the next tax rate. If a ballot question presents
327 a phased-in tax rate increase, upon voter approval, each tax
328 rate increase shall be adjusted in the manner prescribed in
329 this section to yield the sum of: the amount of revenue
330 that would be derived by applying such voter-approved

SB 1293 12
331 increased rate to the total assessed valuation, as most
332 recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before
333 the date of the election in which such increase was
334 approved, increased by the percentage increase in the
335 consumer price index, as provided by law, from the date of
336 the election to the time of such increase and, so adjusted,
337 shall be the current tax rate ceiling.
338 (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (2)
339 of this subsection to the contrary, if prior to the
340 expiration of a temporary levy increase, voters approve a
341 subsequent levy increase, the new tax rate ceiling shall
342 remain in effect only until such time as the temporary levy
343 expires under the terms originally approved by a vote of the
344 people, at which time the tax rate ceiling shall be
345 decreased by the amount of the temporary levy increase. If,
346 prior to the expiration of a temporary levy increase, voters
347 of a political subdivision are asked to approve an
348 additional, permanent increase to the political
349 subdivision's tax rate ceiling, voters shall be submitted
350 ballot language that clearly indicates that if the permanent
351 levy increase is approved, the temporary levy shall be made
352 permanent.
353 (4) The governing body of any political subdivision
354 may levy a tax rate lower than its tax rate ceiling [and].
355 Such reduction to the tax rate ceiling in a nonreassessment
356 year shall be applied in the immediately following year of
357 general reassessment. The governing body of any political
358 subdivision may, in a nonreassessment year, increase that
359 previously lowered tax rate to a level not exceeding the tax
360 rate ceiling without voter approval in the manner provided
361 under subdivision [(4)] (5) of this subsection. Such
362 increase to the tax rate ceiling in a nonreassessment year

SB 1293 13
363 shall be applied in the immediately following year of
364 general reassessment. Nothing in this section shall be
365 construed as prohibiting a political subdivision from
366 voluntarily levying a tax rate lower than that which is
367 required under the provisions of this section or from
368 seeking voter approval of a reduction to such political
369 subdivision's tax rate ceiling.
370 [(4)] (5) In a year of general reassessment, a
371 governing body whose tax rate is lower than its tax rate
372 ceiling shall revise its tax rate pursuant to the provisions
373 of subsection 4 of this section as if its tax rate was at
374 the tax rate ceiling. In a year following general
375 reassessment, if such governing body intends to increase its
376 tax rate, the governing body shall conduct a public hearing,
377 and in a public meeting it shall adopt an ordinance,
378 resolution, or policy statement justifying its action prior
379 to setting and certifying its tax rate. The provisions of
380 this subdivision shall not apply to any political
381 subdivision which levies a tax rate lower than its tax rate
382 ceiling solely due to a reduction required by law resulting
383 from sales tax collections. The provisions of this
384 subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision
385 which has received voter approval for an increase to its tax
386 rate ceiling subsequent to setting its most recent tax rate.
387 (6) (a) As used in this subdivision, the following
388 terms shall mean:
389 a. "Current tax rate ceiling", the tax rate ceiling in
390 effect before the voters approve a higher tax rate;
391 b. "Increased tax rate ceiling", the new tax rate
392 ceiling in effect after the voters approve a higher tax rate.
393 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
394 contrary, when the required majority of voters in a

SB 1293 14
395 political subdivision approves an increase in the political
396 subdivision's tax rate, the political subdivision shall use
397 the current tax rate ceiling and the increase approved by
398 the voters in establishing the rates of levy for the tax
399 year immediately following the election.
400 (c) If the assessed valuation of real property in such
401 political subdivision is reduced in such tax year
402 immediately following the election, such political
403 subdivision may raise its rates of levy so that the revenue
404 received from its local real property tax rates equals the
405 amount the political subdivision would have received from
406 the increased rates of levy had there been no reduction in
407 the assessed valuation of real property in the political
408 subdivision.
409 (d) Using the increased tax rate ceiling shall be
410 revenue neutral as required in Article X, Section 22 of the
411 Constitution of Missouri.
412 6. (1) For the purposes of calculating state aid for
413 public schools pursuant to section 163.031, each taxing
414 authority which is a school district shall determine its
415 proposed tax rate as a blended rate of the classes or
416 subclasses of property. Such blended rate shall be
417 calculated by first determining the total tax revenue of the
418 property within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority,
419 which amount shall be equal to the sum of the products of
420 multiplying the assessed valuation of each class and
421 subclass of property by the corresponding tax rate for such
422 class or subclass, then dividing the total tax revenue by
423 the total assessed valuation of the same jurisdiction, and
424 then multiplying the resulting quotient by a factor of one
425 hundred. Where the taxing authority is a school district,
426 such blended rate shall also be used by such school district

SB 1293 15
427 for calculating revenue from state-assessed railroad and
428 utility property as defined in chapter 151 and for
429 apportioning the tax rate by purpose.
430 (2) Each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate
431 in any year shall notify the clerk of the county commission
432 in the county or counties where the tax rate applies of its
433 tax rate ceiling and its proposed tax rate. Each taxing
434 authority shall express its proposed tax rate in a fraction
435 equal to the nearest one-tenth of a cent, unless its
436 proposed tax rate is in excess of one dollar, then one/one-
437 hundredth of a cent. If a taxing authority shall round to
438 one/one-hundredth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction
439 greater than or equal to five/one-thousandth of one cent to
440 the next higher one/one-hundredth of a cent; if a taxing
441 authority shall round to one-tenth of a cent, it shall round
442 up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-hundredths
443 of a cent to the next higher one-tenth of a cent. Any
444 taxing authority levying a property tax rate shall provide
445 data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state
446 auditor by rule, substantiating such tax rate complies with
447 Missouri law. All forms for the calculation of rates
448 pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as a rule and
449 shall not be incorporated by reference. The state auditor
450 shall promulgate rules for any and all forms for the
451 calculation of rates pursuant to this section which do not
452 currently exist in rule form or that have been incorporated
453 by reference. In addition, each taxing authority proposing
454 to levy a tax rate for debt service shall provide data, in
455 such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by
456 rule, substantiating the tax rate for debt service complies
457 with Missouri law. A tax rate proposed for annual debt
458 service requirements will be prima facie valid if, after

SB 1293 16
459 making the payment for which the tax was levied, bonds
460 remain outstanding and the debt fund reserves do not exceed
461 the following year's payments. The county clerk shall keep
462 on file and available for public inspection all such
463 information for a period of three years. The clerk shall,
464 within three days of receipt, forward a copy of the notice
465 of a taxing authority's tax rate ceiling and proposed tax
466 rate and any substantiating data to the state auditor. The
467 state auditor shall, within fifteen days of the date of
468 receipt, examine such information and return to the county
469 clerk his or her findings as to compliance of the tax rate
470 ceiling with this section and as to compliance of any
471 proposed tax rate for debt service with Missouri law. If
472 the state auditor believes that a taxing authority's
473 proposed tax rate does not comply with Missouri law, then
474 the state auditor's findings shall include a recalculated
475 tax rate, and the state auditor may request a taxing
476 authority to submit documentation supporting such taxing
477 authority's proposed tax rate. The county clerk shall
478 immediately forward a copy of the auditor's findings to the
479 taxing authority and shall file a copy of the findings with
480 the information received from the taxing authority. The
481 taxing authority shall have fifteen days from the date of
482 receipt from the county clerk of the state auditor's
483 findings and any request for supporting documentation to
484 accept or reject in writing the rate change certified by the
485 state auditor and to submit all requested information to the
486 state auditor. A copy of the taxing authority's acceptance
487 or rejection and any information submitted to the state
488 auditor shall also be mailed to the county clerk. If a
489 taxing authority rejects a rate change certified by the
490 state auditor and the state auditor does not receive

SB 1293 17
491 supporting information which justifies the taxing
492 authority's original or any subsequent proposed tax rate,
493 then the state auditor shall refer the perceived violations
494 of such taxing authority to the attorney general's office
495 and the attorney general is authorized to obtain injunctive
496 relief to prevent the taxing authority from levying a
497 violative tax rate.
498 (3) In the event that the taxing authority incorrectly
499 completes the forms created and promulgated under
500 subdivision (2) of this subsection, or makes a clerical
501 error, the taxing authority may submit amended forms with an
502 explanation for the needed changes. If such amended forms
503 are filed under regulations prescribed by the state auditor,
504 the state auditor shall take into consideration such amended
505 forms for the purposes of this subsection.
506 7. No tax rate shall be extended on the tax rolls by
507 the county clerk unless the political subdivision has
508 complied with the foregoing provisions of this section.
509 8. Whenever a taxpayer has cause to believe that a
510 taxing authority has not complied with the provisions of
511 this section, the taxpayer may make a formal complaint with
512 the prosecuting attorney of the county. Where the
513 prosecuting attorney fails to bring an action within ten
514 days of the filing of the complaint, the taxpayer may bring
515 a civil action pursuant to this section and institute an
516 action as representative of a class of all taxpayers within
517 a taxing authority if the class is so numerous that joinder
518 of all members is impracticable, if there are questions of
519 law or fact common to the class, if the claims or defenses
520 of the representative parties are typical of the claims or
521 defenses of the class, and if the representative parties
522 will fairly and adequately protect the interests of the

SB 1293 18
523 class. In any class action maintained pursuant to this
524 section, the court may direct to the members of the class a
525 notice to be published at least once each week for four
526 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
527 published in the county where the civil action is commenced
528 and in other counties within the jurisdiction of a taxing
529 authority. The notice shall advise each member that the
530 court will exclude him or her from the class if he or she so
531 requests by a specified date, that the judgment, whether
532 favorable or not, will include all members who do not
533 request exclusion, and that any member who does not request
534 exclusion may, if he or she desires, enter an appearance.
535 In any class action brought pursuant to this section, the
536 court, in addition to the relief requested, shall assess
537 against the taxing authority found to be in violation of
538 this section the reasonable costs of bringing the action,
539 including reasonable attorney's fees, provided no attorney's
540 fees shall be awarded any attorney or association of
541 attorneys who receive public funds from any source for their
542 services. Any action brought pursuant to this section shall
543 be set for hearing as soon as practicable after the cause is
544 at issue.
545 9. If in any action, including a class action, the
546 court issues an order requiring a taxing authority to revise
547 the tax rates as provided in this section or enjoins a
548 taxing authority from the collection of a tax because of its
549 failure to revise the rate of levy as provided in this
550 section, any taxpayer paying his or her taxes when an
551 improper rate is applied has erroneously paid his or her
552 taxes in part, whether or not the taxes are paid under
553 protest as provided in section 139.031 or otherwise
554 contested. The part of the taxes paid erroneously is the

SB 1293 19
555 difference in the amount produced by the original levy and
556 the amount produced by the revised levy. The township or
557 county collector of taxes or the collector of taxes in any
558 city shall refund the amount of the tax erroneously paid.
559 The taxing authority refusing to revise the rate of levy as
560 provided in this section shall make available to the
561 collector all funds necessary to make refunds pursuant to
562 this subsection. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
563 any money erroneously paid by him or her pursuant to this
564 subsection. Effective in the 1994 tax year, nothing in this
565 section shall be construed to require a taxing authority to
566 refund any tax erroneously paid prior to or during the third
567 tax year preceding the current tax year.
568 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
569 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
570 authority delegated in this section shall become effective
571 only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
572 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
573 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
574 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
575 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
576 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
577 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
578 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
579 2004, shall be invalid and void.
1 137.079. Prior to setting its [rate or] rates as
2 required by section 137.073, each taxing authority shall
3 exclude from its total assessed valuation seventy-two
4 percent of the total amount of assessed value of business
5 personal property that is the subject of an appeal at the
6 state tax commission or in a court of competent jurisdiction
7 in this state. This exclusion shall only apply to the

SB 1293 20
8 portion of the assessed value of business personal property
9 that is disputed in the appeal, and shall not exclude any
10 portion of the same property that is not disputed. [If the
11 taxing authority uses a multirate approach] For the purpose
12 of setting rates as provided in section 137.073, this
13 exclusion shall be made from the personal property class.
14 The state tax commission shall provide each taxing authority
15 with the total assessed value of business personal property
16 within the jurisdiction of such taxing authority for which
17 an appeal is pending no later than August twentieth of each
18 year. Whenever any appeal is resolved, whether by final
19 adjudication or settlement, and the result of the appeal
20 causes money to be paid to the taxing authority, the taxing
21 authority shall not be required to make an additional
22 adjustment to its rate or rates due to such payment once the
23 deadline for setting its rates, as provided by this chapter,
24 has passed in a taxable year, but shall adjust its rate or
25 rates due to such payment in the next rate setting cycle to
26 offset the payment in the next taxable year. For the
27 purposes of this section, the term "business personal
28 property" means tangible personal property which is used in
29 a trade or business or used for production of income and
30 which has a determinable life of longer than one year except
31 that supplies used by a business shall also be considered
32 business personal property, but shall not include livestock,
33 farm machinery, property subject to the motor vehicle
34 registration provisions of chapter 301, property subject to
35 the tables provided in section 137.078, the property of
36 rural electric cooperatives under chapter 394, or property
37 assessed by the state tax commission under chapters 151,
38 153, and 155, section 137.022, and sections 137.1000 to
39 137.1030.

SB 1293 21
1 137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary
2 notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
3 all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
4 shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
5 property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
6 district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
7 this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
8 annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
9 one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
10 first of each calendar year. The assessor shall annually
11 assess all real property, including any new construction and
12 improvements to real property, and possessory interests in
13 real property at the percent of its true value in money set
14 in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of
15 any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3),
16 where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate
17 airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan,
18 as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a
19 FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political
20 subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in
21 money of any such possessory interest in real property, less
22 the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than
23 the political subdivision, towards any new construction or
24 improvements on such real property completed after January
25 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned
26 possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such
27 costs were incurred or whether such costs were considered in
28 any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real
29 property in the following manner: new assessed values shall
30 be determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year
31 and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
32 assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered

SB 1293 22
33 year, except for new construction and property improvements
34 which shall be valued as though they had been completed as
35 of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
36 assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
37 residence of each person required by this chapter to list
38 property, and require the person to make a correct statement
39 of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
40 person or under his or her care, charge or management,
41 taxable in the county. On or before January first of each
42 even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a
43 two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing
44 body and the state tax commission for their respective
45 approval or modification. The county governing body shall
46 approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan
47 to the state tax commission by February first. If the
48 county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
49 alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by
50 February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered
51 approved by the county governing body. If the state tax
52 commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
53 commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
54 county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in
55 order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section
56 137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the
57 administrative hearing commission, by May first, to decide
58 all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance
59 plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be
60 stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
61 arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final
62 decision of the administrative hearing commission shall be
63 subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the
64 county involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1)

SB 1293 23
65 real property within any county with a charter form of
66 government, or within a city not within a county, is made by
67 a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program,
68 the burden of proof, supported by clear, convincing and
69 cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the
70 assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county,
71 unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
72 presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
73 computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such
74 evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
75 following:
76 (1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal
77 of the property by generally accepted appraisal techniques;
78 and
79 (2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three
80 comparable properties and the address or location thereof.
81 As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
82 that:
83 (a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the
84 property valuation; and
85 (b) Such properties are not more than one mile from
86 the site of the disputed property, except where no similar
87 properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
88 the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such
89 property shall be within five hundred square feet in size of
90 the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in
91 age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other relevant
92 characteristics.
93 2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
94 of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
95 through the mail.

SB 1293 24
96 3. The following items of personal property shall each
97 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
98 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
99 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
100 money:
101 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
102 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
103 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
104 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
105 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
106 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
107 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
108 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
109 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
110 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
111 percent;
112 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
113 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
114 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
115 introducing new product lines or used for making
116 improvements to existing products by any company which is
117 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
118 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
119 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
120 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
121 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
122 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
123 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
124 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
125 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
126 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
127 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank

SB 1293 25
128 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
129 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
130 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
131 delivered to the assessor.
132 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
133 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
134 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
135 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
136 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
137 percent;
138 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
139 and
140 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
141 percent.
142 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
143 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
144 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
145 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
146 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
147 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
148 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
149 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
150 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
151 subclassification.
152 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
153 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
154 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
155 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
156 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
157 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
158 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
159 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of

SB 1293 26
160 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
161 collector may request the county commission to have the
162 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
163 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
164 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
165 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
166 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
167 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
168 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
169 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
170 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
171 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
172 may be considered real property.
173 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
174 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
175 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
176 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015
177 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
178 estate parcel.
179 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
180 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
181 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
182 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
183 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
184 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
185 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
186 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
187 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
188 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
189 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
190 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
191 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,

SB 1293 27
192 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
193 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
194 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
195 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
196 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
197 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
198 in value published in the current October issue of the
199 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
200 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
201 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
202 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
203 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
204 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
205 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
206 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
207 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
208 such information or publications that, in the assessor's
209 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
210 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
211 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
212 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
213 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
214 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
215 in the previous year.
216 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
217 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property by
218 more than fifteen percent since the last assessment,
219 excluding increases due to new construction or improvements,
220 the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such
221 property.
222 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to
223 subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify the

SB 1293 28
224 property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the
225 owner clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to
226 the physical inspection. If a physical inspection is
227 required, the property owner may request that an interior
228 inspection be performed during the physical inspection. The
229 owner shall have no less than thirty days to notify the
230 assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
231 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection
232 10 of this section, shall include, but not be limited to, an
233 on-site personal observation and review of all exterior
234 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to
235 which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
236 external access, and shall include an observation and review
237 of the interior of any buildings or improvements on the
238 property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to
239 subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the
240 property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not be
241 considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as
242 required by this section.
243 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
244 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
245 license due. No county or city collector may charge
246 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
247 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
248 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
249 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
250 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
251 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
252 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
253 14. [Any county or city not within a county in this
254 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
255 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and

SB 1293 29
256 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
257 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
258 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
259 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
260 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
261 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
262 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
263 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
264 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
265 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
266 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
267 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
268 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
269 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
270 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
271 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
272 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision
273 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
274 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
275 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
276 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
277 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
278 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
279 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
280 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
281 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
282 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
283 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
284 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
285 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
286 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
287 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative

SB 1293 30
288 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
289 any year.
290 15. The governing body of any city of the third
291 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
292 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
293 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
294 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
295 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
296 property only if such city bills and collects its own
297 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
298 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
299 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
300 city's tax rate ceiling.
301 16.] Any portion of real property that is available as
302 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
303 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
304 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
305 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
306 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
307 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
308 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
309 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
310 records, and information requested, except such books,
311 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
312 in nature, including individually identifiable information
313 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
314 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
315 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
316 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
317 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
318 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
✓